West Virginia, session 2025, HB3397.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 2. Crimes Against the Person. §61-2-15a. Assault, battery on athletic officials; penalties. (a) If any person commits an assault, as defined in §61-2-9(b), to the person of an athletic official during the time the official is acting as an athletic official, the offender is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more less than $500 nor more than $1,000, or confined in jail not more than six months, or both fined and confined.(b) If any person commits a battery, as defined in §61-2-9(c), against an athletic official during the time the official is acting as an athletic official, the offender is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more less than $1,000 nor more than $3,000, or confined in jail not more than twelve months, or both fined and confined.(c) For the purpose of this section, "athletic official" means a person at a sports event who enforces the rules of that event, such as an umpire or referee, or a person who supervises the participants, such as a coach.